Utah statutes.
35A-8-1003.   State Community Services Office created -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the Housing and Community Development Division the State Community Services Office.

(2)  The office shall strengthen communities by reducing poverty and improving the quality of life for low-income persons in this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

